Florida, session 2026, SB1238.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 146 147 Section 1.âSection 419.001, Florida Statutes, is amended to 148 read: 149 419.001âCommunity residences and recovery communities; 150 definitions Site selection of community residential homes.âFor 151 the purposes of this chapter, the term: 152 (1)âFor the purposes of this section, the term: 153 (a)ââCommunity residence residential homeâ means a 154 residential living arrangement for unrelated individuals with 155 disabilities living as the functional equivalent of a family in 156 a dwelling unit, townhome, duplex, or triplex who need the 157 mutual support furnished by other residents of the dwelling as 158 well as the support services, if any, provided by any staff of 159 the community residence. The term includes a living arrangement 160 in which residents may be selfâgoverning or supervised by a 161 sponsoring entity or its staff, which provide habilitative or 162 rehabilitative services related to the residentsâ disabilities. 163 A community residence operates as the functional equivalent of a 164 family to foster normalization of its residents, integrate them 165 into the surrounding community, and use neighbors as role models 166 for those residents capable of going into the community and 167 interacting with neighbors. Supportive interrelationships 168 between residents are an essential component. Its primary 169 purpose is to provide shelter; foster and facilitate life 170 skills; and meet the physical, emotional, and social needs of 171 the residents in a mutually supportive familyâlike environment. 172 The term includes, but is not limited to, residences licensed by 173 the Agency for Persons with Disabilities, the Department of 174 Elderly Affairs, the Agency for Health Care Administration, and 175 the Department of Children and Families; recovery residences 176 certified by the stateâs designated credentialing entity 177 established under s. 397.487; and recovery residences 178 democratically operated by their residents pursuant to a charter 179 from an entity recognized or sanctioned by Congress a dwelling 180 unit licensed to serve residents who are clients of the 181 Department of Elderly Affairs, the Agency for Persons with 182 Disabilities, the Department of Juvenile Justice, or the 183 Department of Children and Families or licensed by the Agency 184 for Health Care Administration which provides a living 185 environment for 7 to 14 unrelated residents who operate as the 186 functional equivalent of a family, including such supervision 187 and care by supportive staff as may be necessary to meet the 188 physical, emotional, and social needs of the residents. 189 (2)ââCongregate living facilityâ means a group living 190 arrangement that provides long-term care, accommodations, food 191 service, and one or more personal care services to people with 192 or without disabilities who pose a direct threat to the health 193 or safety of others, and who are not related to the owner or 194 administrator by blood or marriage. 195 (a)âCongregate living facilities include, but are not 196 limited to: 197 1.âAn intermediate care or assisted living facility that 198 does not operate as the functional equivalent of a family. 199 2.âA group living arrangement that is an alternative to 200 incarceration for people who pose a direct threat to the health 201 or safety of others. 202 3.âA facility for the treatment of substance use disorders 203 where treatment is the primary purpose and use of the facility, 204 whether it provides services only or includes a residential 205 component on site. 206 4.âA facility for a group living arrangement too large to 207 operate as the functional equivalent of a family where 208 normalization, community integration, and the use of neighbors 209 as role models are not integral elements. 210 (b)âA congregate living facility is not a community 211 residence or a recovery community. 212 (3)ââDisabilityâ means a physical or mental impairment that 213 substantially limits an individualâs major life activities or 214 impairs an individualâs ability to live independently. The term 215 includes an individual having a record of such an impairment or 216 being regarded as having such an impairment as defined in the 217 federal Fair Housing Act and Americans with Disabilities Act. 218 The term includes, but is not limited to, all of the following: 219 (a)âAn elderly person with disabilities as described in s. 220 429.65(9). 221 (b)âA person with development disabilities as defined in s. 222 393.063. 223 (c)âA person with a mental illness as defined in s. 224 394.455. 225 (d)âA person in recovery from substance abuse as defined in 226 s. 397.311. 227 228 The term âdisabilityâ does not include individuals with a 229 substance use disorder who use illegal substances or substances 230 to which they are addicted or individuals who constitute a 231 direct threat to the health and safety of other persons. 232 (4)ââFamily community residenceâ means a community 233 residence that provides a long-term living arrangement of at 234 least 6 months duration and does not limit how long a resident 235 may live there. Typical uses may include, but are not limited 236 to, all of the following: 237 (a)âA community residential home for people with a 238 disability who do not pose a threat to the health and safety of 239 other persons and whose residency would not result in 240 substantial physical damage to the property of others. 241 (b)âA group home for people with a disability which 242 operates as the functional equivalent of a family, including, 243 but not limited to, people with mental illness, physical 244 disabilities, or a substance use disorder. 245 (c)âAn assisted living facility for the elderly licensed 246 under s. 429.07. 247 (d)âAn adult familyâcare home licensed under s. 429.67. 248 (e)âA community residential home licensed by the Department 249 of Elderly Affairs, the Agency for Persons with Disabilities, 250 the Department of Children and Families, or the Agency for 251 Health Care Administration which provides a living environment 252 for residents who operate as the functional equivalent of a 253 family. 254 (f)âAn intermediate care facility licensed under s. 400.962 255 which operates as the functional equivalent of a family. 256 (g)âHousing licensed under chapter 394. 257 (h)âRecovery residences certified under s. 397.487 or 258 certified recovery residences as defined in s. 397.311 where 259 residency is typically at least 6 months. 260 (i)âRecovery residences democratically operated by their 261 residents pursuant to a charter from an entity recognized or 262 sanctioned by Congress. 263 (5)(b)ââLicensing or certifying entityâ or âlicensing 264 entitiesâ means the Department of Elderly Affairs, the Agency 265 for Persons with Disabilities, the Department of Juvenile 266 Justice, the Department of Children and Families, the Florida 267 Association of Recovery Residences or other licensing or 268 certifying entity as determined by the Department of Children 269 and Families pursuant to s. 397.487, or the Agency for Health 270 Care Administration, all of which are authorized to license a 271 community residential home to serve residents. 272 (6)(c)ââLocal governmentâ means a county as set forth in 273 chapter 125 7 or a municipality incorporated under the 274 provisions of chapter 165. 275 (7)(d)ââLong termâ means a continuous period of 6 or more 276 months âPlanned residential communityâ means a local government 277 approved, planned unit development that is under unified 278 control, is planned and developed as a whole, has a minimum 279 gross lot area of 8 acres, and has amenities that are designed 280 to serve residents with a developmental disability as defined in 281 s. 393.063 but that shall also provide housing options for other 282 individuals. The community shall provide choices with regard to 283 housing arrangements, support providers, and activities. The 284 residentsâ freedom of movement within and outside the community 285 may not be restricted. For the purposes of this paragraph, local 286 government approval must be based on criteria that include, but 287 are not limited to, compliance with appropriate land use, 288 zoning, and building codes. A planned residential community may 289 contain two or more community residential homes that are 290 contiguous to one another. A planned residential community may 291 not be located within a 10-mile radius of any other planned 292 residential community. 293 (8)ââReasonable accommodationâ means providing one or more 294 individuals with a disability and providers of housing for one 295 or more individuals with a disability the opportunity to receive 296 modification or waiver of certain requirements for land use, 297 zoning, or property maintenance and building code regulations to 298 give such individual or individuals with a disability an equal 299 opportunity to use and enjoy a dwelling within the meaning of 42 300 U.S.C. s. 3604(f). 301 (9)ââRecovery communityâ means multiple dwelling units, 302 including adjacent multifamily structures, duplexes, triplexes, 303 and quadraplexes; attached singleâfamily dwellings; a series of 304 adjacent singleâfamily detached dwellings; or a group of such 305 adjacent dwellings which are not held out to the general public 306 for rent or occupancy and which provide a mutually supportive, 307 drugâfree, and alcoholâfree living arrangement for people in 308 recovery from a substance use disorder who do not operate as the 309 functional equivalent of a family and are under the auspices of 310 a single sponsoring entity or group of related sponsoring 311 entities. 312 (a)âThe term includes land uses for which the sponsoring 313 entity is eligible to apply for certification pursuant to s. 314 397.487. 315 (b)âThe term does not include other group living 316 arrangements for people who are not disabled or any community 317 residence, congregate living facility, institutional or medical 318 use facility, shelter, lodging or boarding house, extended stay 319 hotel, nursing home, vacation rental, or other living 320 arrangement for similar use. 321 (10)ââRecovery residenceâ has the same meaning as in s. 322 397.311. 323 (11)(e)ââResidentâ means any of the following: a frail 324 elder as defined in s. 429.65; a person who has a disability as 325 defined in s. 760.22 s. 760.22(3)(a); a person who has a 326 developmental disability as defined in s. 393.063; a 327 nondangerous person who has a mental illness as defined in s. 328 394.455; a person in recovery from a substance use disorder; or 329 live-in staff or a child who is found to be dependent as defined 330 in s. 39.01, or a child in need of services as defined in s. 331 984.03. 332 (12)(f)ââSponsoring entity agencyâ means an agency or unit 333 of government, a for-profit profit or nonprofit agency, or any 334 other person or organization that which intends to establish or 335 operate a community residence, recovery community, recovery 336 residence, or congregate living facility residential home. 337 (13)ââTransitional community residenceâ means a community 338 residence that provides a temporary living arrangement of less 339 than 6 months for unrelated people with disabilities. 340 Transitional community residences include, but are not limited 341 to: 342 (a)âA group home for individuals with a disability which 343 operates as the functional equivalent of a family. 344 (b)âA community residence for people with a disability who 345 do not pose a direct threat to the health and safety of other 346 persons or whose residency would not result in substantial 347 physical damage to the property of others. 348 (c)âHousing connected to outpatient treatment licensed 349 under chapter 394. 350 (d)âA living arrangement licensed by the Department of 351 Elderly Affairs, the Agency for Persons with Disabilities, the 352 Department of Juvenile Justice, the Department of Children and 353 Families, or the Agency for Health Care Administration which 354 provides a living environment for 7 to 14 unrelated residents 355 who operate as the functional equivalent of a family. 356 (e)âA certified recovery residence as defined in s. 357 397.311, at which residency is typically less than 6 months. 358 (f)âA separate residential community housing component, 359 pursuant to s. 397.311(9), of a day or night treatment facility 360 with a community housing license 361 (2)âHomes of six or fewer residents which otherwise meet 362 the definition of a community residential home shall be deemed a 363 single-family unit and a noncommercial, residential use for the 364 purpose of local laws and ordinances. Homes of six or fewer 365 residents which otherwise meet the definition of a community 366 residential home shall be allowed in single-family or 367 multifamily zoning without approval by the local government, 368 provided that such homes are not located within a radius of 369 1,000 feet of another existing such home with six or fewer 370 residents or within a radius of 1,200 feet of another existing 371 community residential home. Such homes with six or fewer 372 residents are not required to comply with the notification 373 provisions of this section; provided that, before licensure, the 374 sponsoring agency provides the local government with the most 375 recently published data compiled from the licensing entities 376 that identifies all community residential homes within the 377 jurisdictional limits of the local government in which the 378 proposed site is to be located in order to show that there is 379 not a home of six or fewer residents which otherwise meets the 380 definition of a community residential home within a radius of 381 1,000 feet and not a community residential home within a radius 382 of 1,200 feet of the proposed home. At the time of home 383 occupancy, the sponsoring agency must notify the local 384 government that the home is licensed by the licensing entity. 385 For purposes of local land use and zoning determinations, this 386 subsection does not affect the legal nonconforming use status of 387 any community residential home lawfully permitted and operating 388 as of July 1, 2016. 389 (3)(a)âWhen a site for a community residential home has 390 been selected by a sponsoring agency in an area zoned for 391 multifamily, the agency shall notify the chief executive officer 392 of the local government in writing and include in such notice 393 the specific address of the site, the residential licensing 394 category, the number of residents, and the community support 395 requirements of the program. Such notice shall also contain a 396 statement from the licensing entity indicating the licensing 397 status of the proposed community residential home and specifying 398 how the home meets applicable licensing criteria for the safe 399 care and supervision of the clients in the home. The sponsoring 400 agency shall also provide to the local government the most 401 recently published data compiled from the licensing entities 402 that identifies all community residential homes within the 403 jurisdictional limits of the local government in which the 404 proposed site is to be located. The local government shall 405 review the notification of the sponsoring agency in accordance 406 with the zoning ordinance of the jurisdiction. 407 (b)âPursuant to such review, the local government may: 408 1.âDetermine that the siting of the community residential 409 home is in accordance with local zoning and approve the siting. 410 If the siting is approved, the sponsoring agency may establish 411 the home at the site selected. 412 2.âFail to respond within 60 days. If the local government 413 fails to respond within such time, the sponsoring agency may 414 establish the home at the site selected. 415 3.âDeny the siting of the home. 416 (c)âThe local government shall not deny the siting of a 417 community residential home unless the local government 418 establishes that the siting of the home at the site selected: 419 1.âDoes not otherwise conform to existing zoning 420 regulations applicable to other multifamily uses in the area. 421 2.âDoes not meet applicable licensing criteria established 422 and determined by the licensing entity, including requirements 423 that the home be located to assure the safe care and supervision 424 of all clients in the home. 425 3.âWould result in such a concentration of community 426 residential homes in the area in proximity to the site selected, 427 or would result in a combination of such homes with other 428 residences in the community, such that the nature and character 429 of the area would be substantially altered. A home that is 430 located within a radius of 1,200 feet of another existing 431 community residential home in a multifamily zone shall be an 432 overconcentration of such homes that substantially alters the 433 nature and character of the area. A home that is located within 434 a radius of 500 feet of an area of single-family zoning 435 substantially alters the nature and character of the area. 436 (4)âCommunity residential homes, including homes of six or 437 fewer residents which would otherwise meet the definition of a 438 community residential home, which are located within a planned 439 residential community are not subject to the proximity 440 requirements of this section and may be contiguous to each 441 other. A planned residential community must comply with the 442 applicable local governmentâs land development code and other 443 local ordinances. A local government may not impose proximity 444 limitations between homes within a planned residential community 445 if such limitations are based solely on the types of residents 446 anticipated to be living in the community. 447 (5)âAll distance requirements in this section shall be 448 measured from the nearest point of the existing home or area of 449 single-family zoning to the nearest point of the proposed home. 450 (6)âIf agreed to by both the local government and the 451 sponsoring agency, a conflict may be resolved through informal 452 mediation. The local government shall arrange for the services 453 of an independent mediator. Mediation shall be concluded within 454 45 days of a request therefor. The resolution of any issue 455 through the mediation process shall not alter any personâs right 456 to a judicial determination of any issue if that person is 457 entitled to such a determination under statutory or common law. 458 (7)âThe licensing entity shall not issue a license to a 459 sponsoring agency for operation of a community residential home 460 if the sponsoring agency does not notify the local government of 461 its intention to establish a program, as required by subsection 462 (3). A license issued without compliance with the provisions of 463 this section shall be considered null and void, and continued 464 operation of the home may be enjoined. 465 (8)âA dwelling unit housing a community residential home 466 established pursuant to this section shall be subject to the 467 same local laws and ordinances applicable to other 468 noncommercial, residential family units in the area in which it 469 is established. 470 (9)âNothing in this section shall be deemed to affect the 471 authority of any community residential home lawfully established 472 prior to October 1, 1989, to continue to operate. 473 (10)âNothing in this section shall permit persons to occupy 474 a community residential home who would constitute a direct 475 threat to the health and safety of other persons or whose 476 residency would result in substantial physical damage to the 477 property of others. 478 (11)âThe siting of community residential homes in areas 479 zoned for single family shall be governed by local zoning 480 ordinances. Nothing in this section prohibits a local government 481 from authorizing the development of community residential homes 482 in areas zoned for single family. 483 (12)âNothing in this section requires any local government 484 to adopt a new ordinance if it has in place an ordinance 485 governing the placement of community residential homes that meet 486 the criteria of this section. State law on community residential 487 homes controls over local ordinances, but nothing in this 488 section prohibits a local government from adopting more liberal 489 standards for siting such homes. 490 Section 2.âSection 419.003, Florida Statutes, is created to 491 read: 492 419.003âCommunity residences.â 493 (1)âPURPOSE AND DUTIES.â 494 (a)âA community residence is considered a residential use 495 of property for purposes of all local government land use and 496 zoning codes. 497 (b)âA community residence shall do all of the following: 498 1.âProvide safe and accommodating shelter for persons with 499 disabilities. 500 2.âOperate as the functional equivalent of a family by 501 providing the opportunity for residents to form supportive 502 relationships that nurture their physical, emotional, and social 503 needs within a familyâlike relational structure. 504 3.âFoster the normalization of residents, assist their 505 integration into the surrounding community, and, when residents 506 are capable, use neighbors without disabilities as role models. 507 4.âProvide a safe and nurturing space for residents to gain 508 and practice life skills. 509 (c)âThe residents of a community residence must receive 510 care by supportive staff as may be necessary to meet their 511 physical, emotional, and social needs. 512 (d)âResidents may be selfâgoverning or may be supervised by 513 a sponsoring entity that provides habilitative or rehabilitative 514 services related to the residentsâ disabilities. 515 (2)âCOMMUNITY RESIDENCES EXEMPTED FROM THIS CHAPTER.â 516 (a)âA community residence constitutes a family for purposes 517 of zoning and is not subject to this chapter when: 518 1.âThe number of occupants of a community residence, 519 including liveâin staff, does not exceed the maximum number of 520 unrelated individuals, as determined by the definition of 521 family, family unit, household, or a similar term in the 522 appropriate local government land use code, ordinance, or 523 regulation; 524 2.âA local governmentâs land use code, ordinance, or 525 regulation does not stipulate a specific number of unrelated 526 people which constitutes a family, family unit, household, or 527 similar term; or 528 3.âA local governmentâs land use code, ordinance, or 529 regulation does not define family, family unit, household, or a 530 similar term. 531 (b)âA community residence that is exempted from this 532 chapter pursuant subparagraph (a)1. may not be included when 533 determining spacing distance requirements. 534 (3)âLICENSURE AND OPERATIONS.â 535 (a)âA community residence must be licensed or certified to 536 operate when this state offers licensing or certification, or 537 must operate pursuant to a charter from an entity recognized or 538 sanctioned by Congress. 539 (b)âA local government may revoke or nullify siting 540 approval of a community residence if: 541 1.âThe sponsoring entity fails to provide the local 542 government with evidence of permanent licensure or certification 543 from the state; or 544 2.âThe community residence is not operated pursuant to a 545 charter from an entity recognized or sanctioned by Congress. 546 (c)âA sponsoring entity of a community residence whose 547 license, certification, or charter, or application for such 548 license, certification, or charter, has been revoked or denied 549 by a licensing or certifying entity may not operate in this 550 state. Any zoning approval granted to such sponsoring entity 551 becomes null and void upon the revocation or denial of its 552 license, certification, or charter. The sponsoring entity of a 553 community residence may appeal the revocation or denial of its 554 license, certification, or charter. Any zoning approval granted 555 to a sponsoring entity must be stayed pending the outcome of 556 such appeal. 557 (d)âThe sponsoring entity of a community residence must 558 notify the designated local government official within 5 559 calendar days after receiving notice that its license, 560 certification, or charter has been revoked or denied. The 561 sponsoring entity shall cease operations within 60 calendar days 562 after the date on which the sponsoring entity receives notice of 563 the denial or revocation, except that the local government may 564 require operations to cease immediately when continued operation 565 poses a threat to the health and safety of the residents or the 566 community residence. In such event, the sponsoring entity must 567 coordinate the reunion of the residents with their families or 568 arrange for the relocation of the residents to a safe and secure 569 living environment. Enforcement of a revocation or denial must 570 be stayed pending the outcome of an appeal unless a local 571 government requires the sponsoring entity to cease operations. 572 (4)âSITING.âSpacing distances under this section must be 573 measured from the nearest lot line of the existing community 574 residence, recovery community, or congregate living facility 575 closest to the proposed community residence or recovery 576 community to the nearest lot line of the proposed community 577 residence or recovery community. A community residence that is 578 exempted from this chapter pursuant to subsection (2) may not be 579 included when determining spacing distance requirements. Each 580 street and alley within the specified spacing distance 581 requirement counts as 1 parcel lot. 582 Section 3.âSection 419.005, Florida Statutes, is created to 583 read: 584 419.005âCommunity residences; permitted use.â 585 (1)âFAMILY COMMUNITY RESIDENCE.âA family community 586 residence is considered a residential use as of right in all 587 zoning districts where residences are allowed as of right, 588 provided that it complies with subsection (3). 589 (2)âTRANSITIONAL COMMUNITY RESIDENCE.âA transitional 590 community residence constitutes a residential use allowed as of 591 right in all zoning districts where multifamily dwellings, 592 duplexes, triplexes, or other forms of multifamily structures 593 are allowed as of right, provided that it complies with 594 subsection (3). 595 (3)âREQUIREMENTS.âFamily and transitional community 596 residences shall be allowed as of right as permitted uses only 597 if such residences comply with the following requirements: 598 (a)âThe proposed community residence must be located at 599 least 660 feet or 7 consecutive parcel lots, including each 600 street and alley as 1 parcel lot, whichever is a greater 601 distance, from the closest existing community residence, 602 recovery community, or congregate living facility. 603 (b)âThe proposed community residence has been issued and 604 maintains: 605 1.âA license, certification, or charter required to operate 606 the proposed community residence; or 607 2.âA provisional or conditional license, certification, or 608 charter during an application process as determined by the 609 designated licensing, certifying, or chartering entity. 610 (c)âNo more than 12 individuals occupy the proposed 611 community residence, subject to the local governmentâs standard 612 housing, building, or property maintenance codeâs provisions 613 related to overcrowding. 614 (4)âCODE COMPLIANCE.âA community residence is considered a 615 residential use of property for purposes of local government 616 land use and zoning codes when in compliance with this chapter. 617 (5)âEXCEPTIONS.â 618 (a)âFor purposes of local land use and zoning 619 determinations, this section does not affect: 620 1.âThe legal nonconforming use status of any community 621 residence lawfully permitted and operating before July 1, 2026, 622 as long as it is licensed or certified no later than July 1, 623 2027, or a reasonable accommodation is granted under s. 624 419.007(2) by July 1, 2027. 625 2.âThe authority of any community residence lawfully 626 established before July 1, 2026, to continue to operate as long 627 as it is licensed or certified no later than July 1, 2027, or a 628 reasonable accommodation is granted under s. 419.007(2) by July 629 1, 2027. 630 (b)âThis section may not be construed to require a local 631 government to amend its land use code if it has adopted zoning 632 provisions governing the placement of community residences that 633 meet the criteria of this section and ss. 419.003 and 419.007. 634 (c)âThis section may not be construed to prohibit a local 635 government from adopting less restrictive zoning for siting 636 community residences. 637 (d)âNo spacing distance may be greater than those specified 638 in paragraph (3)(a). 639 (6)âENFORCEMENT.âA local government may require a 640 sponsoring entity for a community residence to cease operations 641 immediately if continued operation poses an immediate and 642 significant threat to the health and safety of the residents or 643 the community. 644 Section 4.âSection 419.007, Florida Statutes, is created to 645 read: 646 419.007âCommunity residences; reasonable accommodation.â 647 (1)âACCOMMODATION TO LOCATE WITHIN APPLICABLE SPACING 648 DISTANCE.âA proposed community residence that does not comply 649 with standards required in s. 419.005(3)(a) must be allowed as a 650 reasonable accommodation from the applicable local government if 651 the sponsoring entity demonstrates all of the following: 652 (a)âThe proposed community residence will not interfere 653 with the normalization and community integration, and, where 654 practical, the use of neighbors without disabilities as role 655 models, of the residents of the closest existing community 656 residence or recovery community. 657 (b)âThe closest community residence, recovery community, or 658 congregate living facility will not interfere with the 659 normalization and community integration of the residents of the 660 proposed community residence. 661 (2)âCOMPLIANCE FACTORS.âPrimary factors that must be 662 considered when determining compliance with subsection (1) 663 include: 664 (a)âThe linear distance along the pedestrian right-of-way 665 between the two residences. 666 (b)âThe likelihood of residents of one site interacting 667 with residents of the other site. 668 (c)âWhether the residents of both sites have different 669 disabilities or no disability. 670 (d)âWhether the proposed community residence in combination 671 with any existing community residence, recovery community, or 672 congregate living facility will alter the residential character 673 of the surrounding neighborhood by creating an institutional 674 atmosphere or de facto social service district by clustering 675 such residences on a block face or concentrating them in a 676 neighborhood. 677 (3)âACCOMMODATION WITHOUT LICENSURE, CERTIFICATION, OR 678 DESIGNATION.âIf the state does not offer a license or 679 certification for the type of community residence proposed and 680 the population it would house, or if such proposed community 681 residence is not eligible for designation as a recovery 682 residence democratically operated by its residents from an 683 entity recognized or sanctioned by the Congress, the local 684 government must authorize a reasonable accommodation for the 685 proposed community residence if the sponsoring entity 686 demonstrates that: 687 (a)âThe proposed community residence operates or will 688 operate in a manner effectively similar to that of a licensed, 689 certified, or chartered residence; 690 (b)âStaff residing or working in the proposed community 691 residence are adequately trained in accordance with standards 692 typically required by licensing or state certification for a 693 community residence; 694 (c)âThe proposed community residence operates or will 695 operate as the functional equivalent of a family and achieve 696 normalization, community integration, and, when the residents 697 are capable, the use of neighbors without disabilities as role 698 models; and 699 (d)âThe rules and practices governing the operation of the 700 proposed community residence protect the residents from abuse, 701 exploitation, fraud, theft, neglect, insufficient support, use 702 of illegal drugs or alcohol, and misuse of prescription 703 medications. 704 (4)âACCOMMODATION TO HOUSE MORE THAN 12 UNRELATED PEOPLE. 705 If a proposed community residence is intended to house more than 706 12 unrelated people, the local government must authorize a 707 reasonable accommodation for the proposed community residence if 708 the sponsoring entity demonstrates that: 709 (a)âThe proposed number of residents greater than 12 is 710 necessary to ensure the therapeutic or financial viability of 711 the proposed community residence; 712 (b)âThe primary function of the proposed community 713 residence is residential, and any medical treatment is 714 incidental to the residential use of the property; 715 (c)âThe proposed community residence operates as the 716 functional equivalent of a family rather than a boarding or 717 rooming house; nursing home; short-term rental; continuing care 718 facility; motel; hotel; treatment center; rehabilitation center; 719 institutional use facility; assisted living facility or 720 community residential home that does not comport with the 721 definition of community residence in this chapter; or other 722 nonresidential use; and 723 (d)âThe requested number of residents in the proposed 724 community residence will not interfere with the normalization 725 and community integration of the occupants of the closest 726 existing community residence or recovery community or, when the 727 residents are capable, the use of neighbors without disabilities 728 as role models. 729 (5)âACCOMMODATION TO PERMIT TRANSITIONAL COMMUNITY 730 RESIDENCES IN SINGLE-FAMILY ZONING.âThe local government must 731 authorize a reasonable accommodation for a transitional 732 community residence to be sited in an area of singleâfamily 733 zoning where single-family detached dwellings are the only 734 dwellings allowed as permitted uses, provided that the 735 sponsoring entity demonstrates that: 736 (a)âThe proposed transitional community residence complies 737 with ss. 419.003 and 419.005; and 738 (b)âThe proposed transitional community residence is found 739 to be compatible with the residential uses allowed as of right 740 in the zoning district. 741 Section 5.âSection 419.009, Florida Statutes, is created to 742 read: 743 419.009âRecovery community as a permitted use.â 744 (1)âLICENSURE AND OPERATIONS.â 745 (a)âA recovery community must be licensed or certified by a 746 licensing or certifying entity. A local government may revoke 747 siting approval of a recovery community if the sponsoring entity 748 fails to provide evidence of permanent licensure or 749 certification. 750 (b)âA sponsoring entity for a recovery community whose 751 license or certification has been denied or revoked may not 752 operate in this state. Any zoning approval granted to such 753 sponsoring entity becomes null and void upon the denial or 754 revocation of such license or certification. If a sponsoring 755 entity appeals a revocation or denial of licensure or 756 certification, any zoning approval granted to such sponsoring 757 entity must be stayed pending the outcome of the appeal. 758 (c)âThe sponsoring entity must notify the designated local 759 government official or other applicable entity that its license 760 or certification has been revoked or denied within 5 calendar 761 days after receiving notice of such revocation or denial. The 762 sponsoring entity must cease operations within 60 calendar days 763 after such notice, except that the local government may require 764 operations to cease immediately when continued operation poses a 765 threat to the health and safety of the residents or the recovery 766 community. The sponsoring entity must coordinate the reunion of 767 the residents with their families or arrange for the relocation 768 of the residents to a safe and secure living environment. 769 Enforcement of the revocation or denial of a license or 770 certification must be stayed pending the outcome of an appeal 771 unless a local government requires the sponsoring entity to 772 cease operations. 773 (2)âSITING AND ZONING.âA recovery community constitutes a 774 residential use allowed in all zoning districts where 775 townhouses, duplexes, triplexes, or other forms of multifamily 776 structures are allowed as permitted uses, provided that the 777 sponsoring entity has received certification from the designated 778 certifying entity as established by s. 397.487 and meets the 779 following requirements: 780 (a)âA proposed recovery community housing up to 16 781 occupants is located at least 660 feet or 7 consecutive parcel 782 lots, with each street and alley counting as 1 parcel lot, 783 whichever is the greater distance, from the closest recovery 784 community, community residence, or congregate living facility; 785 (b)âA proposed recovery community housing 17 to 30 786 occupants is located at least 900 feet or 9 consecutive parcel 787 lots, with each street and alley counting as 1 parcel lot, 788 whichever is the greater distance, from the closest recovery 789 community, community residence, or congregate living facility; 790 (c)âA proposed recovery community housing 31 to 50 791 occupants is located at least 1,300 feet or 13 consecutive 792 parcel lots, with each street and alley counting as 1 parcel 793 lot, whichever is the greater distance, from the closest 794 recovery community, community residence, or congregate living 795 facility; 796 (d)âA proposed recovery community housing 51 to 100 797 occupants is located at least 1,400 feet or 14 consecutive 798 parcel lots, with each street and alley counting as 1 parcel 799 lot, whichever is the greater distance, from the closest 800 recovery community, community residence, or congregate living 801 facility; or 802 (e)âA proposed recovery community housing more than 100 803 occupants is located at least 1,500 feet or 15 consecutive 804 parcel lots, with each street and alley counting as 1 parcel 805 lot, whichever is the greater distance, from the closest 806 recovery community, community residence, or congregate living 807 facility. 808 (3)âEXCEPTIONS.â 809 (a)âFor purposes of local land use and zoning 810 determinations, this section does not affect: 811 1.âThe legal nonconforming use status of any recovery 812 community lawfully permitted and operating before July 1, 2026. 813 2.âThe authority of any recovery community lawfully 814 established before July 1, 2026, to continue to operate. 815 (b)âThis section may not be construed to require a local 816 government to amend its land use code if it has adopted zoning 817 provisions governing the placement of recovery communities that 818 meet the criteria of subsections (1) and (2). 819 (c)âThis section may not be construed to prohibit a local 820 government from adopting less restrictive zoning for siting 821 recovery communities. 822 (d)âNo spacing distance may be greater than those specified 823 in subsection (2). 824 (4)âENFORCEMENT.â 825 (a)âA local government may require a sponsoring entity of a 826 recovery community to cease operations immediately if continued 827 operation poses an immediate and significant threat to the 828 health and safety of the residents or the community. 829 (b)âThis section may not be construed to permit persons who 830 are known to constitute a direct threat to the health and safety 831 of others or whose residency would result in substantial 832 physical damage to the person or property of others to reside in 833 a community residence. 834 Section 6.âSection 419.013, Florida Statutes, is created to 835 read: 836 419.013âRecovery communities as reasonable accommodation.â 837 (1)âA recovery community proposed to be located within the 838 distance requirements specified in s. 419.009(2) from the 839 closest existing community residence, recovery community, or 840 congregate living facility must be allowed a reasonable 841 accommodation if the sponsoring entity demonstrates that: 842 (a)âThe proposed recovery community will not interfere with 843 the normalization and community integration of the residents of 844 the closest existing community residence or recovery community; 845 and 846 (b)âThe closest existing community residence, recovery 847 community, or congregate living facility will not interfere with 848 the normalization, community integration, or, when residents are 849 capable, the use of neighbors without disabilities as role 850 models. 851 (2)âPrimary factors that must be considered when 852 determining compliance with subsection (1) include: 853 (a)âThe linear distance along the pedestrian right-of-way 854 between the two residences. 855 (b)âThe likelihood of residents of one site interacting 856 with residents of the other site. 857 (c)âWhether the residents of both sites have different 858 disabilities or no disabilities. 859 (3)âA proposed recovery community in combination with any 860 existing community residence, recovery community, or congregate 861 living facility may not alter the residential character of the 862 surrounding neighborhood by creating an institutional atmosphere 863 or by creating or intensifying an institutional atmosphere or de 864 facto social service district by clustering community 865 residences, recovery communities, or congregate living 866 facilities on a block face or concentrating them in a 867 neighborhood. 868 Section 7.âSection 419.015, Florida Statutes, is created to 869 read: 870 419.015âCommunity residences and recovery communities; 871 applicable spacing distance; assistance.â 872 (1)âA local government shall respond in writing within 10 873 business days to a request from a sponsoring entity as to 874 whether a proposed site for a community residence or recovery 875 community is within the applicable spacing distance established 876 by this chapter from the closest existing community residence, 877 recovery community, or congregate living facility. The response 878 must include the calculated distance relied upon to deny an 879 otherwise permitted use. 880 (2)âIf the proposed community residence or recovery 881 community is within the applicable spacing distance specified in 882 s. 419.005(3)(a), the local government must, upon request by the 883 sponsoring entity, provide, at no charge and in writing within 884 20 business days after receiving the request, all of the 885 following information: 886 (a)âThe address of existing community residences, recovery 887 communities, or congregate living facilities within the 888 applicable spacing distance from the proposed community 889 residence or recovery community. 890 (b)âThe exact linear distance along the pedestrian pathway 891 of the proposed community residence or recovery community from 892 the closest existing community residence, recovery community, or 893 congregate living facility. 894 (c)âThe addresses and general nature of the residentsâ 895 disabilities in all existing community residences and recovery 896 communities as well as the nature of the population served at 897 any congregate living facilities within a oneâhalf mile radius 898 of the proposed community residence or recovery community. 899 Section 8.âSubsection (2) of section 393.501, Florida 900 Statutes, is amended to read: 901 393.501âRulemaking.â 902 (2)âSuch rules must address the number of facilities on a 903 single lot or on adjacent lots, except that there is no 904 restriction on the number of facilities designated as community 905 residences as defined in s. 419.001 residential homes located 906 within a planned residential community as those terms are 907 defined in s. 419.001(1). 908 Section 9.âParagraph (k) of subsection (6) of section 909 400.464, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 910 400.464âHome health agencies to be licensed; expiration of 911 license; exemptions; unlawful acts; penalties.â 912 (6)âThe following are exempt from licensure as a home 913 health agency under this part: 914 (k)âThe delivery of community residential services for 915 which the community residence residential home is licensed under 916 chapter 419, to serve the residents in its facility. 917 Section 10.âParagraph (c) of subsection (3) of section 918 400.9972, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 919 400.9972âLicense required; fee; application.â 920 (3)âAn applicant for licensure must provide: 921 (c)âProof of compliance with local zoning requirements, 922 including compliance with the requirements of chapter 419 if the 923 proposed facility is a community residence residential home. 924 Section 11.âSubsection (3) of section 429.11, Florida 925 Statutes, is amended to read: 926 429.11âInitial application for license.â 927 (3)âIf the applicant is a community residence residential 928 home, the applicant must provide proof that it has met the 929 requirements specified in chapter 419. 930 Section 12.âSubsection (5) of section 429.67, Florida 931 Statutes, is amended to read: 932 429.67âLicensure.â 933 (5)âUnless the adult family-care home is a community 934 residence residential home subject to chapter 419, the applicant 935 must provide documentation, signed by the appropriate 936 governmental official, that the home has met local zoning 937 requirements for the location for which the license is sought. 938 Section 13.âParagraph (e) of subsection (2) of section 939 1003.57, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 940 1003.57âExceptional students instruction.â 941 (2) 942 (e)âThis subsection applies to any nonresident student with 943 a disability who resides in a residential facility and who 944 receives instruction as an exceptional student with a disability 945 in any type of residential facility in this state, including, 946 but not limited to, a public school, a private school, a group 947 home facility as defined in s. 393.063, an intensive residential 948 treatment program for children and adolescents as defined in s. 949 395.002, a facility as defined in s. 394.455, an intermediate 950 care facility for the developmentally disabled or ICF/DD as 951 defined in s. 393.063 or s. 400.960, or a community residence 952 residential home as defined in s. 419.001. 953 Section 14.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.